Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 2.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-20,179
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298; Laws 2015, LB157, § 10. Operative date January 1, 2017. Foreign corporation;
revocation of certificate of authority; grounds.

The
Secretary of State may commence a proceeding under section 21-20,180 to revoke
the certificate of authority of a foreign corporation authorized to transact
business in this state if:

(1) The foreign corporation is without a registered agent
or registered office in this state for sixty days or more;

(2) The foreign corporation does not inform the Secretary
of State under section 21-20,175 or 21-20,176 that its registered agent or
registered office has changed, that its registered agent has resigned, or
that its registered office has been discontinued within sixty days of the
change, resignation, or discontinuance;

(3) An incorporator, director, officer, or agent of the foreign
corporation signed a document he or she knew was false in any material respect
with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing;

(4) The foreign
corporation or its agent for service of process does not comply with section
21-20,177; or

(5) The
Secretary of State receives a duly authenticated certificate from the official
having custody of the corporate records in the state or country under whose
law the foreign corporation is incorporated stating that it has been dissolved
or has disappeared as the result of a merger.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 179;

Laws 2009, LB97, § 2.